Illinois, session 104th, SB91.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Sections 6-109, 6-207, and 6-911 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/6-109)7    Sec. 6-109. Examination of applicants. 8    (a) The Secretary of State shall examine every applicant 9for a driver's license or permit who has not been previously 10licensed as a driver under the laws of this State or any other 11state or country, or any applicant for renewal of such 12driver's license or permit when such license or permit has 13been expired for more than one year. The Secretary of State 14shall, subject to the provisions of paragraph (c), examine 15every licensed driver at least every 8 years, and may examine 16or re-examine any other applicant or licensed driver, provided 17that during the years 1984 through 1991 those drivers issued a 18license for 3 years may be re-examined not less than every 7 19years or more than every 10 years.20    The Secretary of State shall require the testing of the 21eyesight of any driver's license or permit applicant who has 22not been previously licensed as a driver under the laws of this 23State and shall promulgate rules and regulations to provide   SB0091- 2 -LRB104 07631 LNS 17675 b1for the orderly administration of all the provisions of this 2Section.3    The Secretary of State shall include at least one test 4question that concerns the provisions of the Pedestrians with 5Disabilities Safety Act in the question pool used for the 6written portion of the driver's license examination within one 7year after July 22, 2010 (the effective date of Public Act 896-1167). 9    The Secretary of State shall include, in the question pool 10used for the written portion of the driver's license 11examination, test questions concerning safe driving in the 12presence of bicycles, of which one may be concerning the Dutch 13Reach method as described in Section 2-112. 14    The Secretary of State shall include, in the question pool 15used for the written portion of the driver's license 16examination, at least one test question concerning driver 17responsibilities when approaching a stationary emergency 18vehicle as described in Section 11-907. If an applicant gives 19an incorrect response to a test question concerning subsection 20(c) of Section 11-907, Section 11-907.5, or subsection (a-1) 21of Section 11-908, then the Secretary of State shall provide 22the applicant with information concerning those Sections. 23    (b) Except as provided for those applicants in paragraph 24(c), such examination shall include a test of the applicant's 25eyesight, his or her ability to read and understand official 26traffic control devices, his or her knowledge of safe driving   SB0091- 3 -LRB104 07631 LNS 17675 b1practices and the traffic laws of this State, and may include 2an actual demonstration of the applicant's ability to exercise 3ordinary and reasonable control of the operation of a motor 4vehicle, and such further physical and mental examination as 5the Secretary of State finds necessary to determine the 6applicant's fitness to operate a motor vehicle safely on the 7highways, except the examination of an applicant 75 years of 8age or older or, if the Secretary adopts rules under Section 37 9of the Secretary of State Act to raise the age requirement for 10actual demonstrations, the examination of an applicant who has 11attained that increased age or is older shall include an 12actual demonstration of the applicant's ability to exercise 13ordinary and reasonable control of the operation of a motor 14vehicle. All portions of written and verbal examinations under 15this Section, excepting where the English language appears on 16facsimiles of road signs, may be given in the Spanish language 17and, at the discretion of the Secretary of State, in any other 18language as well as in English upon request of the examinee. 19Deaf persons who are otherwise qualified are not prohibited 20from being issued a license, other than a commercial driver's 21license, under this Code.22    (c) Re-examination for those applicants who at the time of 23renewing their driver's license possess a driving record 24devoid of any convictions of traffic violations or evidence of 25committing an offense for which mandatory revocation would be 26required upon conviction pursuant to Section 6-205 at the time   SB0091- 4 -LRB104 07631 LNS 17675 b1of renewal shall be in a manner prescribed by the Secretary in 2order to determine an applicant's ability to safely operate a 3motor vehicle, except that every applicant for the renewal of 4a driver's license who is 79 75 years of age or older must 5renew in person, and or, if the Secretary adopts rules under 6Section 37 of the Secretary of State Act to raise the age 7requirement for actual demonstrations, every applicant for the 8renewal of a driver's license who is 87 years of age or has 9attained that increased age or is older or who is 75 years of 10age or older and holds a commercial driver's license must 11prove, by an actual demonstration, the applicant's ability to 12exercise reasonable care in the safe operation of a motor 13vehicle.14    (d) In the event the applicant is not ineligible under the 15provisions of Section 6-103 to receive a driver's license, the 16Secretary of State shall make provision for giving an 17examination, either in the county where the applicant resides 18or at a place adjacent thereto reasonably convenient to the 19applicant, within not more than 30 days from the date said 20application is received.21    (e) The Secretary of State may adopt rules regarding the 22use of foreign language interpreters during the application 23and examination process. 24(Source: P.A. 103-140, eff. 6-30-23; 103-680, eff. 1-1-25.) 25    (625 ILCS 5/6-207)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 6-207)  SB0091- 5 -LRB104 07631 LNS 17675 b1    Sec. 6-207. Secretary of State may require reexamination 2or reissuance of a license.3    (a) The Secretary of State, having good cause to believe 4that a licensed driver or person holding a permit or applying 5for a license or license renewal is incompetent or otherwise 6not qualified to hold a license or permit, may upon written 7notice of at least 5 days to the person require the person to 8submit to an examination, including, but not limited to, a 9physical, mental, or driving examination, as prescribed by the 10Secretary.11    Refusal or neglect of the person to submit an alcohol, 12drug, or intoxicating compound evaluation or submit to or 13failure to successfully complete the examination is grounds 14for suspension of the person's license or permit under Section 156-206 of this Act or cancellation of his license or permit 16under Section 6-201 of this Act.17    (b) The Secretary of State, having issued a driver's 18license or permit in error, may upon written notice of at least 195 days to the person, require the person to appear at a Driver 20Services facility to have the license or permit error 21corrected and a new license or permit issued.22    Refusal or neglect of the person to appear is grounds for 23cancellation of the person's license or permit under Section 246-201 of this Act.25    (c) The Secretary of State, having issued a driver's 26license or permit to a person who subsequently becomes   SB0091- 6 -LRB104 07631 LNS 17675 b1ineligible to retain that license or permit as currently 2issued, may, upon written notice of at least 5 days to the 3person, require the person to appear at a Driver Services 4facility to have the license or permit corrected and a new 5license or permit issued. 6    (d) The Secretary of State, having good cause to believe 7that a driver's license or permit was issued based on invalid, 8fictitious, or fraudulent documents, may upon written notice 9of at least 5 days require the person to appear at a Driver 10Services facility to present valid documents for verification 11of identity. Refusal or neglect of the person to appear shall 12result in cancellation of the person's license or permit. 13    (e) Under 49 C.F.R. 383.73, if the Secretary of State 14receives credible information that a CLP or CDL was issued and 15fraud was committed relating to the issuance of the CLP or CDL, 16the Secretary shall require the CLP or CDL holder to re-submit 17to all testing required for the issuance of the CLP or CDL 18(written, pre-trip, skills, and road exams). Upon written 19notification by the Secretary, the holder shall have 5 days to 20submit to re-examination. Failure to appear or successfully 21complete the examination shall result in the cancellation of 22the CLP or CDL under Section 6-201 of this Act. 23    (f) The Secretary of State may adopt rules to implement 24this Section. 25(Source: P.A. 97-229, eff. 7-28-11; 98-176 (see Section 10 of 26P.A. 98-722 and Section 10 of P.A. 99-414 for the effective   SB0091- 7 -LRB104 07631 LNS 17675 b1date of changes made by P.A. 98-176).) 2    (625 ILCS 5/6-911)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 6-911)3    Sec. 6-911. Information submitted by medical 4practitioners; police officers; State's attorneys; or members 5of the judiciary; or immediate family members. Any qualified 6medical practitioner, commissioned police officer, State's 7attorney, or member of the judiciary acting in his or her 8official capacity, or immediate family member may submit 9information to the Secretary relative to the medical condition 10of a person, including suspected chronic alcoholism or 11habitual use of narcotics or dangerous drugs, if the condition 12interferes with the person's ability to operate a motor 13vehicle safely. Persons reporting under this Section shall 14enjoy the same immunities granted members of the Board under 15Section 6-910. Information must be submitted in writing in a 16manner and form approved by the Secretary and shall include 17the name of the person submitting the information. The 18Secretary may not accept or act on anonymous reports. The 19information submitted pursuant to this Section is confidential 20under Sections 2-123 and 6-908 of this Code. 21    For purposes of this Section, "immediate family member" 22means spouse, parent, grandparent, sibling, or child. 23(Source: P.A. 87-1249.) 24    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 252026.